Maryland, session 2026, HB0304.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – General Provisions
4–205.
(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the custodian of
a public record shall provide an applicant with a copy of the public record in a searchable
and analyzable electronic format if:
(i) the public record is in a searchable and analyzable electronic
format;
(ii) the applicant requests a copy of the public record in a searchable
and analyzable electronic format; and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0304*

HOUSE BILL 304
(iii) the custodian is able to provide a copy of the public record, in
whole or in part, in a searchable and analyzable electronic format that does not disclose:
1. confidential or protected information for which the
custodian is required to deny inspection in accordance with Subtitle 3, Parts I through III
of this title; or
2. information for which a custodian has chosen to deny
inspection in accordance with Subtitle 3, Part IV of this title.
(2) The State Department of Assessments and Taxation is not required to
provide an applicant with a copy of the public record in a searchable and analyzable
electronic format if the State Department of Assessments and Taxation has provided the
public record to a contractor that will provide the applicant a copy of the public record in a
searchable and analyzable electronic format for a reasonable cost.
(3) A custodian may remove metadata from an electronic document before
providing the electronic document to an applicant by:
(i) using a software program or function; or
(ii) converting the electronic document into a different searchable
and analyzable format.
(4) This subsection may not be construed to:
(i) require the custodian to reconstruct a public record in an
electronic format if the custodian no longer has the public record available in an electronic
format;
(ii) allow a custodian to make a public record available only in an
electronic format;
(iii) require a custodian to create, compile, or program a new public
record; or
(iv) require a custodian to release an electronic record in a format
that would jeopardize or compromise the security or integrity of the original record or of
any proprietary software in which the record is maintained.
(5) (I) If a public record exists in a searchable and analyzable electronic
format, the act of a custodian providing a portion of the public record in a searchable and
analyzable electronic format does not constitute creating a new public record.
(II) SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH APPLIES IF A
REQUEST REQUIRES DATA COMPILATION, DATA EXTRACTION, DATA QUERYING,
STATISTICAL AGGREGATION, OR ANY OTHER DATA MANIPULATION THAT THE

HOUSE BILL 304 3
RECORDS DATABASE PROGRAM IS CAPABLE OF PERFORMING TO PRODUCE THE
RECORD.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.